Utah statutes.
4-31-12.   Carcass of infected swine to be burned or buried.
A person who owns or has possession of a swine which dies from hog cholera or
another contagious, infectious, or communicable disease shall dispose of the
carcass by burying or burning it within 24 hours after death.
